Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3290.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65B.28, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Required reduction. An insurer must provide an appropriate premium reduction of at least ten percent on its policies of private passenger vehicle insurance, as defined in section 65B.001, subdivision 2, issued, delivered, or renewed in this state, to deleted text begin insureds 55 years old and olderdeleted text end new text begin an insurednew text end who successfully deleted text begin completedeleted text end new text begin completesnew text end an accident prevention course or refresher course established under subdivisions 2 and 3. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65B.28, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Accident prevention course; rules. (a) The commissioner of public safety must adopt rules establishing and regulating a motor vehicle accident prevention course deleted text begin for persons 55 years old and olderdeleted text end . (b) The rules must, at a minimum, include provisions: (1) establishing curriculum requirements; and (2) providing for the issuance of a course completion certification and requiring its submission to an insured as evidence of completion of the course. (c) The accident prevention course must be a total of four hours. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 65B.28, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Completion certificate. A person deleted text begin 55 years old and olderdeleted text end may retake the original course or take the refresher course every three years and receive a course completion certificate to remain eligible for the premium reduction in subdivision 1. A person deleted text begin 58 years old and olderdeleted text end who successfully completes a retaking of the original course or a refresher course more than three years from the date the person last was eligible for the premium reduction in subdivision 1 is entitled to reinstatement of this eligibility. The Department of Public Safety shall provide criteria for the issuance of the course completion certificates.